California, session 20252026, AB2347.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13519.65 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13519.65. (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, the commission shall conduct a comprehensive review of existing hate crimes training programs, including those under Section 13519.6, offered to law enforcement officers who are employed as peace officers, or who are enrolled in the basic course. The review shall be completed by January 1, 2028.(b) The review shall do all the following:(1) Evaluate disparities in hate crime data collection.(2) Evaluate the effectiveness of law enforcement’s response to hate crimes.(3) Evaluate the efficacy of existing POST trainings on hate crimes.(c) By July 1, 2028, the commission shall adopt evidence-based training requirements to address the gaps identified in subdivision (b) regarding the prevention, identification, and investigation of hate crimes.(d) For purposes of this section, the term “hate crime” has the same meaning as in Section 422.55.